Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-5,105
Class III, IV, or V school district; children residing on federal property; contracts with federal government for instruction; supervisory services of districts; maintenance and operation of schools.

If the board of education of a Class III, IV, or V school district finds it desirable that children of school age or any grade or grades thereof residing on federal property situated in the vicinity of a city of the metropolitan class be given instruction outside the boundaries of such district of the character provided by law for children within the district, under the direction and control of the board of education and that the same is not detrimental to the interests of the school district, the board of education may enter into a contract with the federal government or any agency thereof to provide supervisory services in the construction of school facilities and to maintain and operate schools for the children of residents of such federal installations.

Laws 1957, c. 350, § 1, p. 1194;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-544;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 358.